src/verb.lexc
LEXICON 317
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	314;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	312;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	316;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	313;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	315;

LEXICON 316
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 315
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;

LEXICON 314
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 313
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 312
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	311;

LEXICON 311
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 310
(+z)	309;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 309
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 308
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	306;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	303;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	300;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	299;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	304;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	302;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	307;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 307
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 306
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	305;

LEXICON 305
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 304
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 303
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 302
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	301;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 301
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 300
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 299
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past:+ydH	298;

LEXICON 298
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 297
(+z)	296;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+zsHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+zlAr	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 296
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	295;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	294;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 295
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 294
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 293
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	271;
+Aor:+Hr	270;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	272;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	266;
+Imp:+sA	273;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	263;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	277;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	282;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	281;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	280;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	275;
^DB+Adj+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+Agt^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+ActOf+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAcA	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg+Pnon:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt+A3sg:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+Agt:+yHcH	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	290;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver	292;

LEXICON 292
+Desr:+sA	291;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;

LEXICON 291
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 290
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	286;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr:+sA	288;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	285;
+Narr:+mHS	283;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	289;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	284;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 289
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 288
+Past:+ydH	287;

LEXICON 287
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 286
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 285
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 284
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 283
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 282
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 281
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 280
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	279;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	278;

LEXICON 279
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 278
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 277
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Cop:+dHr	276;

LEXICON 276
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 275
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Cop:+dHr	274;

LEXICON 274
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 273
+A2sg:+nA	#;

LEXICON 272
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 271
^DB+Adverb+AsIf:+cAsHnA	#;

LEXICON 270
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	269;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	268;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	267;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 269
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 268
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;

LEXICON 267
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 266
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	265;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	264;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 265
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 264
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 263
+A3pl:+lAr	262;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	261;

LEXICON 262
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 261
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 260
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	258;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	254;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	247;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	243;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	255;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	251;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	259;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+NotState:+mAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	257;

LEXICON 259
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 258
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 257
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	256;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;

LEXICON 256
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;

LEXICON 255
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 254
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	253;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	252;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 253
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 252
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 251
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	250;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	249;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	248;

LEXICON 250
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 249
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 248
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 247
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	246;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	245;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	244;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 246
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 245
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 244
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 243
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 242
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	236;
+Aor:+Hr	234;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	241;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	231;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	227;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	225;
+Opt:+yA	237;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	235;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	228;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	240;

LEXICON 241
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 240
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	239;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	238;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;

LEXICON 239
+A1sg:+Hm	#;

LEXICON 238
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 237
+A1pl:+lHm	#;

LEXICON 236
^DB+Adverb+AsIf:+cAsHnA	#;

LEXICON 235
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 234
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+Cond:+ysA	233;
+Past:+ydH	232;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 233
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 232
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 231
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cond:+ysA	230;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	229;

LEXICON 230
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 229
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 228
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 227
+A3pl:+lAr	226;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 226
+Cop:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 225
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

!degil LEXICON 224
!degil +A1pl:+yHz	#;
!degil +A1sg:+yHm	#;
!degil +A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
!degil +A2sg:+sHn	#;
!degil +A3pl:+lAr	223;
!degil +Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 223
+Cop:+dHr	#;
